Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1995YH (2) 91 jm/md H.F. 235 Section 1. Section 331.423, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. (1) Notwithstanding the limitations 3 under paragraphs âbâ and âcâ , for fiscal years beginning 4 on or after July 1, 2026, if the total assessed value used 5 to calculate taxes for general county services under this 6 subsection for the budget year is equal to or less than 7 one hundred one percent of the total assessed value used to 8 calculate taxes for general county services for the current 9 fiscal year, the levy rate under this subsection may be 10 increased up to a rate per thousand dollars of assessed 11 value used to calculate taxes that is equal to one thousand 12 multiplied by the quotient of one hundred three percent of the 13 current fiscal yearâs actual property tax dollars certified 14 for levy under this subsection 1 divided by the total assessed 15 value used to calculate such taxes for the budget year. 16 (2) A general county basic levy rate shall only be adjusted 17 under this paragraph one time for one fiscal year for each 18 county. 19 Sec. 2. Section 331.423, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 20 by adding the following new paragraph: 21 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. (1) Notwithstanding the limitations 22 under paragraphs âbâ and âcâ , for fiscal years beginning on 23 or after July 1, 2026, if the total assessed value used to 24 calculate taxes for rural county services under this subsection 25 for the budget year is equal to or less than one hundred one 26 percent of the total assessed value used to calculate taxes 27 for rural county services for the current fiscal year, the 28 levy rate under this subsection may be increased up to a rate 29 per thousand dollars of assessed value used to calculate taxes 30 that is equal to one thousand multiplied by the quotient of 31 one hundred three percent of the current fiscal yearâs actual 32 property tax dollars certified for levy under this subsection 33 2 divided by the total assessed value used to calculate such 34 taxes for the budget year. 35 -1- LSB 1995YH (2) 91 jm/md 1/ 2 H.F. 235 (2) A rural county basic levy rate shall only be adjusted 1 under this paragraph one time for one fiscal year for each 2 county. 3